Utah statutes.
48-1d-910.   Liability of partner and person dissociation as partner when claim against limited liability partnership is barred.

If a claim against a dissolved limited liability partnership is barred under Section 48-1d-907, 48-1d-908, or 48-1d-909, any corresponding claim under Section 48-1d-306, 48-1d-803, or 48-1d-905 is also barred.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

